Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.202

C.E.P. & R.I. fund—Abolished—Appropriations to be paid from and warrants drawn on account in general fund.

On and after March 20, 1961, the C.E.P. & R.I. fund is abolished; all appropriations made by the thirty-seventh legislature from such abolished fund shall be paid from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account in the general fund and all warrants drawn on the C.E.P. & R.I. fund prior to March 20, 1961 and not theretofore presented for payment shall be paid from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.202. Prior: 1961 c 170 s 2.]